Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2256HV (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1024 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. Subtract, to the extent included, 3 the portion of compensation that is authorized pursuant to 29 4 U.S.C. Â§207 to be earned at not less than one and one-half 5 times the regular rate at which the person is employed. 6 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 7 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 8